Utah statutes.
41-6a-530.   Alcohol restricted drivers -- Prohibited from operating a vehicle while having any measurable or detectable amount of alcohol in the person's body -- Penalties.

(1)  An alcohol restricted driver who operates or is in actual physical control of a vehicle in this state with any measurable or detectable amount of alcohol in the person's body is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(2)  A "measurable or detectable amount" of alcohol in the person's body may be established by:

(a)  a chemical test;

(b)  evidence other than a chemical test; or

(c)  a combination of Subsections (2)(a) and (b).

(3)  For any person convicted of a violation of this section, the court shall order the installation of an ignition interlock system as a condition of probation in accordance with Section 41-6a-518 or describe on the record or in a minute entry why the order would not be appropriate.

